Utah statutes.
20A-15-105.   Poll watchers.

(1)  If one or more of the candidates listed upon the official ballot under the heading "For Ratification of Proposed Change in Constitution of the United States" recommends persons to act as poll watchers, the county legislative body shall designate those persons to act as poll watchers for that group at each polling place within the county.

(2)  If one or more of the candidates listed upon the official ballot under the heading "Against Ratification of Proposed Change in Constitution of the United States" recommends persons to act as poll watchers, the county legislative body shall designate those persons to act as poll watchers for that group at each polling place within the county.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1995 General Session

